apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="ut" c="Common gender (utrum)"/>
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="un" c="Common and neuter"/>
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="top" c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/>

    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular and plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/>

    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive"/>

    <sdef n="vblex" c="Lexical (normal) verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser" c="'To be' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="'To have' verb"/>

    <sdef n="pres" c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="past" c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>

    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="subj" c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj" c="Object"/>

    <sdef n="det"/>

    <sdef n="p1" c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="pos" c="Possesive"/>

    <sdef n="pst" c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="ssup" c="Super-superlative"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Numbers"/>

    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>

    <sdef n="pas" c="Passive"/>
    
    <sdef n="sent" c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm" c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" c="Left parenthesis ("/>
    <sdef n="rpar" c="Right parenthesis )"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
        <re>,</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- Numerals -->

    <pardef n="en__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="et__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="to__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="sådan/__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="smuk__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>

    <pardef n="officiel__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dum__adj"><e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="lykkelig__adj">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mild__adj">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="en__num"/></e>
    <e lm="et"><i>et</i><par n="et__num"/></e>
    <e lm="to"><i>to</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tre"><i>tre</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fire"><i>fire</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fem"><i>fem</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="seks"><i>seks</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="syv"><i>syv</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="otte"><i>otte</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ni"><i>ni</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ti"><i>ti</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
    <e lm="bred"><i>bred</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="dum__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dyb"><i>dyb</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dyr"><i>dyr</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="farlig"><i>farlig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fattig"><i>fattig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="flad"><i>flad</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fornuftig"><i>fornuftig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fri"><i>fri</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fuld"><i>fuld</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="generel"><i>generel</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kold"><i>kold</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kort"><i>kort</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="langsom"><i>langsom</i><par n="dum__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lav"><i>lav</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sådan"><i>sådan</i><par n="sådan/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lykkelig"><i>lykkelig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lys"><i>lys</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mild"><i>mild</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nem"><i>nem</i><par n="dum__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ny"><i>ny</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nysgerrig"><i>nysgerrig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="officiel"><i>officiel</i><par n="officiel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oprindelig"><i>oprindelig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ren"><i>ren</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rig"><i>rig</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skarp"><i>skarp</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="smuk"><i>smuk</i><par n="smuk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="speciel"><i>speciel</i><par n="officiel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sur"><i>sur</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tidlig"><i>tidlig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tom"><i>tom</i><par n="dum__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tung"><i>tung</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tydelig"><i>tydelig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tyk"><i>tyk</i><par n="smuk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="varm"><i>varm</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="venlig"><i>venlig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="videnskabelig"><i>videnskabelig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vigtig"><i>vigtig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
